src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection

!! The UNDEFINED language adjectives compare.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ADJECTIVES 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON A_
+Adj+TYÄ: K ;

LEXICON A-SPAT_
+Adj+Spat+TYÄ: K ;


LEXICON A-IS-GEN
+Gen+Attr: K ;

LEXICON A_АВА
+A: K ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_АВА ;

LEXICON A_ОФТА
!офта:офт
+A:%>%{АОЕ%} K ;
+A+Der/MWN:%>%{АОЕ%} N_ОФТА ;

LEXICON A_ПИНГЕ
!пинге:пинг
+A:%>%{АОЕ%} K ;
+A+Der/MWN:%>%{АОЕ%} N_ПИНГЕ ;

LEXICON A_ПУЛА
!пула:пул
+A:%>%{АОЕ%} K ;
+A+Der/MWN:%>%{АОЕ%} N_ПУЛА ;

LEXICON A_ОШ
!! ош:ош
+A: K ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ОШ ;

LEXICON A_КАЛ
!кал:кал
+A: K ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_КАЛ ;

LEXICON A_КЕЛУ
!! келу:келу
+A: K ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_КЕЛУ ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
